Massachusetts, session 194th, H4742.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Gary L.
Thomann, the police chief of Pelham police department, may continue to serve in the position
until May 17, 2032, the date of his retirement, or until the date he is relieved of his duties,
whichever occurs first; provided, however, that he is mentally and physically capable of
performing the duties of his office. The select board may require, at its own expense, that Gary
L. Thomann be examined by an impartial physician designated by the select board to determine
such capability. No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of Gary L.
Thomann pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service subsequent to May 31,
2027, and upon retirement, Gary L. Thomann shall receive a superannuation retirement
allowance equal to that which he would have been entitled had he retired on May 31, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1